Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.08
American Indian Day; proclamation by Governor; commemoration.

(1) The Governor shall, prior to the fourth Monday in September of each year, issue a proclamation inviting and urging the people of the State of Nebraska to observe American Indian Day with suitable ceremony and fellowship.

(2) The State Department of Education and the Commission on Indian Affairs shall make, within the limits of funds available for such purpose, information available to all people of this state regarding American Indian Day and the observance thereof.

Laws 1983, LB 90, § 3.